Nebraska, session 109, LB251.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 8-113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-113 (1) No individual, firm, company, corporation, or association doing
business in the State of Nebraska, unless organized as a bank under the
Nebraska Banking Act or the authority of the director or federal government, a
digital asset depository that is not a digital asset depository institution, or
as a building and loan association, savings and loan association, or savings
bank under Chapter 8, article 3, or the authority of the federal government,
shall use the word bank or any derivative thereof as any part of a title or
description of any business activity.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Banks, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations,
or savings banks chartered and supervised by a foreign state agency;
(b) Bank holding companies registered pursuant to section 8-913 if the
term holding company is also used as any part of the title or description of
any business activity or if the derivative banc is used;
(c) Affiliates or subsidiaries of (i) a bank organized under the Nebraska
Banking Act or the authority of the federal government or chartered and
supervised by a foreign state agency, (ii) a building and loan association,
savings and loan association, or savings bank organized under Chapter 8,
article 3, or the authority of the federal government or chartered and
supervised by a foreign state agency, or (iii) a bank holding company
registered pursuant to section 8-913 if the term holding company is also used
as any part of the title or description of any business activity or if the
derivative banc is used;
(d) Organizations substantially owned by (i) a bank organized under the
Nebraska Banking Act or the authority of the federal government or chartered
and supervised by a foreign state agency, (ii) a building and loan association,
savings and loan association, or savings bank organized under Chapter 8,
article 3, or the authority of the federal government or chartered and
supervised by a foreign state agency, (iii) a bank holding company registered
pursuant to section 8-913 if the term holding company is also used as any part
of the title or description of any business activity or if the derivative banc
is used, or (iv) any combination of entities listed in subdivisions (i) through
(iii) of this subdivision;
(e) Mortgage bankers licensed or registered under the Residential Mortgage
Licensing Act, if the word mortgage immediately precedes the word bank or its
derivative;
(f) Digital asset depository institutions chartered under the Nebraska
Financial Innovation Act, if the term digital asset is also used as any part of
the title or description of any business activity or if any derivative of the
word bank is used in such title or description of any such business activity;
(g) Any entities with a pending application for the relevant charter,
license, status, or other designation, as identified within subdivisions (2)(a)
through (f) of this section, provided that if the entity's application is
withdrawn or denied, the entity shall cease using the word bank or any
derivative thereof as any part of a title or description of any business
activity within thirty days after the withdrawal or denial of the application;
(h) (g) Organizations which are described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, which are exempt from
taxation under section 501(a) of the code, and which are not providing or
arranging for financial services subject to the authority of the department, a
foreign state agency, or the federal government;
(i) (h) Trade associations which are exempt from taxation under section
501(c)(6) of the code and which represent a segment of the banking or savings
and loan industries, and any affiliate or subsidiary thereof;
(j) (i) Firms, companies, corporations, or associations which sponsor
-1-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
incentive-based solid waste recycling programs that issue reward points or
credits to persons for their participation therein; and
(k) (j) Such other firms, companies, corporations, or associations as have
been in existence and doing business prior to December 1, 1975, under a name
composed in part of the word bank or some derivative thereof.
(3) This section does not apply to an individual, firm, company,
corporation, or association doing business in Nebraska which uses the word bank
or any derivative thereof as any part of a title or description of any business
activity if such use is unlikely to mislead or confuse the public or give the
impression that such individual, firm, company, corporation, or association is
lawfully organized and operating as a bank under the Nebraska Banking Act or
the authority of the federal government, or as a building and loan association,
savings and loan association, or savings bank under Chapter 8, article 3, or
the authority of the federal government.
(4) Any violation of this section is a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. Section 8-135, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-135 (1) All persons, regardless of age, may become depositors in any
bank and shall be subject to the same duties and liabilities respecting their
deposits. Whenever a deposit is accepted by any bank in the name of any person,
regardless of age, the deposit may be withdrawn by the depositor by any of the
following methods:
(a) Check or other instrument in writing. The check or other instrument in
writing constitutes a receipt or acquittance if the check or other instrument
in writing is signed by the depositor and constitutes a valid release and
discharge to the bank for all payments so made; or
(b) Electronic means through:
(i) Preauthorized direct withdrawal;
(ii) An automatic teller machine;
(iii) A debit card;
(iv) A transfer by telephone;
(v) A network, including the Internet; or
(vi) Any electronic terminal, computer, magnetic tape, or other electronic
means.
(2) All persons, individually or with others and regardless of age, may
enter into an agreement with a bank for the lease of a safe deposit box and
shall be bound by the terms of the agreement.
(3) This section shall not be construed to affect the rights, liabilities,
or responsibilities of participants in an electronic fund transfer under the
federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693 et seq., as such act
existed on January 1, 2025 2024, and shall not affect the legal relationships
between a minor and any person other than the bank.
Sec. 3. Section 8-141, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-141 (1) No bank shall directly or indirectly loan to any single
corporation, limited liability company, firm, or individual, including in such
loans all loans made to the several members or shareholders of such
corporation, limited liability company, or firm, for the use and benefit of
such corporation, limited liability company, firm, or individual, more than
twenty-five percent of the paid-up capital, surplus, and capital notes and
debentures or fifteen percent of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus
of such bank, whichever is greater. Such limitations shall be subject to the
following exceptions:
(a) Obligations of any person, partnership, limited liability company,
association, or corporation in the form of notes or drafts secured by shipping
documents or instruments transferring or securing title covering livestock or
giving a lien on livestock , when the market value of the livestock securing
the obligation is not at any time less than one hundred fifteen percent of the
face amount of the notes covered by such documents, shall be subject under this
section to a limitation of ten percent of such capital, surplus, and capital
notes and debentures or ten percent of such unimpaired capital and unimpaired
surplus, whichever is greater, in addition to such twenty-five percent of such
capital and surplus or such fifteen percent of such unimpaired capital and
unimpaired surplus. To qualify for the additional ten percent limit, the bank
shall perfect a security interest in the livestock under applicable law and the
livestock shall at all times have a current market value equal to at least one
hundred fifteen percent of the amount of the secured note that exceeds twenty-
five percent of the bank's capital, surplus, and capital notes and debentures
or fifteen percent of the bank's unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;
(b) Obligations of any person, partnership, limited liability company,
association, or corporation secured by not less than a like amount of bonds or
notes of the United States issued since April 24, 1917, or certificates of
indebtedness of the United States, treasury bills of the United States, or
obligations fully guaranteed both as to principal and interest by the United
States shall be subject under this section to a limitation of ten percent of
such capital, surplus, and capital notes and debentures or ten percent of such
unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus, whichever is greater, in addition to
such twenty-five percent of such capital and surplus or such fifteen percent of
such unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus;
(c) Obligations of any person, partnership, limited liability company,
association, or corporation which are secured by negotiable warehouse receipts
in an amount not less than one hundred fifteen percent of the face amount of
the note or notes secured by such documents shall be subject under this section
-2-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
to a limitation of ten percent of such capital, surplus, and capital notes and
debentures or ten percent of such unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus,
whichever is greater, in addition to such twenty-five percent of such capital,
and surplus, and capital notes and debentures or such fifteen percent of such
unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus. To qualify for the additional ten
percent limit, the receipts securing the obligations shall at all times have a
current market value equal to at least one hundred fifteen percent of the
amount of the obligations that exceeds twenty-five percent of the bank's
capital, surplus, and capital note and debentures or fifteen percent of the
bank's unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus; or
(d) Obligations of any person, partnership, limited liability company,
association, or corporation which are secured by readily marketable collateral
having a market value, as determined by reliable and continuously available
price quotations, in an amount at least equal to the face amount of the note or
notes secured by such collateral, shall be subject under this section to a
limitation of ten percent of such capital, surplus, and capital notes and
debentures or ten percent of such unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus,
whichever is greater, in addition to such twenty-five percent of such capital
and surplus or such fifteen percent of such unimpaired capital and unimpaired
surplus.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, the discounting of bills of exchange,
drawn in good faith against actually existing values, and the discounting of
commercial paper actually owned by the persons negotiating the bills of
exchange or commercial paper shall not be considered as the lending of money.
(b) Loans or obligations shall not be subject to any limitation under this
section, based upon such capital and surplus or such unimpaired capital and
unimpaired surplus, to the extent that such capital and surplus or such
unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus are secured or covered by guaranties,
or by commitments or agreements to take over or to purchase such capital and
surplus or such unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus, made by any federal
reserve bank or by the United States Government or any authorized agency
thereof, including any corporation wholly owned directly or indirectly by the
United States, or general obligations of any state of the United States or any
political subdivision of the state. The phrase general obligation of any state
or any political subdivision of the state means an obligation supported by the
full faith and credit of an obligor possessing general powers of taxation,
including property taxation, but does not include municipal revenue bonds and
sanitary and improvement district warrants which are subject to the limitations
set forth in this section.
(c) Any bank may subscribe to, invest in, purchase, and own single-family
mortgages secured by the Federal Housing Administration or the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs and mortgage-backed certificates of the
Government National Mortgage Association which are guaranteed as to payment of
principal and interest by the Government National Mortgage Association. Such
mortgages and certificates shall not be subject under this section to any
limitation based upon such capital and surplus or such unimpaired capital and
unimpaired surplus.
(d) Obligations representing loans to any national banking association or
to any banking institution organized under the laws of any state, when such
loans are approved by the director by rule and regulation or otherwise, shall
not be subject under this section to any limitation based upon such capital and
surplus or such unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus.
(e) Loans or extensions of credit secured by a segregated deposit account
in the lending bank shall not be subject under this section to any limitation
based on such capital and surplus or such unimpaired capital and unimpaired
surplus. The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing
the terms and conditions of such security interest and segregated deposit
account.
(f) For the purpose of determining lending limits, partnerships shall not
be treated as separate entities. Each individual shall be charged with his or
her personal debt plus the debt of every partnership in which he or she is a
partner, except that for purposes of this section (a) an individual shall only
be charged with the debt of any limited partnership in which he or she is a
partner to the extent that the terms of the limited partnership agreement
provide that such individual is to be held liable for the debts or actions of
such limited partnership and (b) no individual shall be charged with the debt
of any general partnership in which he or she is a partner beyond the extent to
which (i) his or her liability for such partnership debt is limited by the
terms of a contract or other written agreement between the bank and such
individual and (ii) any personal debt of such individual is incurred for the
use and benefit of such general partnership.
(3) A loan made within lending limits at the initial time the loan was
made may be renewed, extended, or serviced without regard to changes in the
lending limit of a bank following the initial extension of the loan if (a) the
renewal, extension, or servicing of the loan does not result in the extension
of funds beyond the initial amount of the loan or (b) the accrued interest on
the loan is not added to the original amount of the loan in the process of
renewal, extension, or servicing.
(4) Any bank may purchase or take an interest in life insurance contracts
for any purpose incidental to the business of banking. A bank's purchase of any
life insurance contract, as measured by its cash surrender value, from any one
life insurance company shall not at any time exceed twenty-five percent of the
paid-up capital, surplus, and capital notes and debentures of such bank or
-3-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
fifteen percent of the unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus of such bank,
whichever is greater. A bank's purchase of life insurance contracts, as
measured by their cash surrender values, in the aggregate from all life
insurance companies shall not at any time exceed thirty-five percent of the
paid-up capital, surplus, undivided profits, and capital notes and debentures
of such bank. The limitations under this subsection on a bank's purchase of
life insurance contracts, in the aggregate from all life insurance companies,
shall not apply to any contract purchased prior to April 5, 1994.
(5) On and after January 21, 2013, the director has the authority to
determine the manner and extent to which credit exposure resulting from
derivative transactions, repurchase agreements, reverse repurchase agreements,
securities lending transactions, and securities borrowing transactions shall be
taken into account for purposes of determining compliance with this section. In
making such determinations, the director may, but is not required to, act by
rule and regulation or order.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Derivative transaction means any transaction that is a contract,
agreement, swap, warrant, note, or option that is based, in whole or in part,
on the value of, any interest in, or any quantitative measure or the occurrence
of any event relating to, one or more commodities, securities, currencies,
interest or other rates, indices, or other assets;
(b) Loan includes:
(i) All direct and indirect advances of funds to a person made on the
basis of any obligation of that person to repay the funds or repayable from
specific property pledged by or on behalf of that person;
(ii) To the extent specified by rule and regulation or order of the
director, any liability of a state bank to advance funds to or on behalf of a
person pursuant to a contractual commitment; and
(iii) Any credit exposure to a person arising from a derivative
transaction, repurchase agreement, reverse repurchase agreement, securities
lending transaction, or securities borrowing transaction between the bank and
the person; and
(c) Unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus means:
(i) For qualifying banks that have elected to use the community bank
leverage ratio framework, as set forth under the Capital Adequacy Standards of
the appropriate federal banking agency:
(A) The bank's tier 1 capital as reported according to the capital
guidelines of the appropriate federal banking agency; and
(B) The bank's allowance for loan and lease losses or allowance for credit
losses, as applicable, as reported in the most recent consolidated report of
condition filed under 12 U.S.C. 1817(a)(3), as such section existed on January
1, 2025 2024; and
(ii) For all other banks:
(A) The bank's tier 1 and tier 2 capital included in the bank's risk-based
capital under the capital guidelines of the appropriate federal banking agency,
based on the bank's most recent consolidated report of condition filed under 12
U.S.C. 1817(a)(3), as such section existed on January 1, 2025 2024; and
(B) The balance of the bank's allowance for loan and lease losses not
included in the bank's tier 2 capital for purposes of the calculation of risk-
based capital by the appropriate federal banking agency, based on the bank's
most recent consolidated report of condition filed under 12 U.S.C. 1817(a)(3),
as such section existed on January 1, 2025 2024.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 8-1,140, the director may,
by order, deny or limit the inclusion of goodwill in the calculation of a
bank's unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus or in the calculation of a
bank's paid-up capital and surplus.
Sec. 4. Section 8-143.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-143.01 (1) No bank shall extend credit to any of its executive officers,
directors, or principal shareholders or to any related interest of such persons
in an amount that, when aggregated with the amount of all other extensions of
credit by the bank to that person and to all related interests of that person,
exceeds the higher of twenty-five thousand dollars or five percent of the
bank's unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus unless (a) the extension of
credit has been approved in advance by a majority vote of the entire board of
directors of the bank, a record of which shall be made and kept as a part of
the records of such bank, and (b) the interested party has abstained from
participating directly or indirectly in such vote.
(2) No bank shall extend credit to any of its executive officers,
directors, or principal shareholders or to any related interest of such persons
in an amount that, when aggregated with the amount of all other extensions of
credit by the bank to that person and to all related interests of that person,
exceeds five hundred thousand dollars except by complying with the requirements
of subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section.
(3) No bank shall extend credit to any of its executive officers, and no
such executive officer shall borrow from or otherwise become indebted to his or
her bank, except in the amounts and for the purposes set forth in subsection
(4) of this section.
(4) A bank shall be authorized to extend credit to any of its executive
officers:
(a) In any amount to finance the education of such executive officer's
children;
(b)(i) In any amount to finance or refinance the purchase, construction,
-4-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
maintenance, or improvement of a residence of such executive officer if the
extension of credit is secured by a first lien on the residence and the
residence is owned or is expected to be owned after the extension of credit by
the executive officer and (ii) in the case of a refinancing, only the amount of
the refinancing used to repay the original extension of credit, together with
the closing costs of the refinancing, and any additional amount thereof used
for any of the purposes enumerated in this subdivision are included within this
category of credit;
(c) In any amount if the extension of credit is (i) secured by a perfected
security interest in bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, or treasury
bills of the United States or in other such obligations fully guaranteed as to
principal and interest by the United States, (ii) secured by unconditional
takeout commitments or guarantees of any department, agency, bureau, board,
commission, or establishment of the United States or any corporation wholly
owned directly or indirectly by the United States, or (iii) secured by a
perfected security interest in a segregated deposit account in the lending
bank; or
(d) For any other purpose not specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c)
of this subsection if the aggregate amount of such other extensions of credit
to such executive officer does not exceed, at any one time, the greater of two
and one-half percent of the bank's unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus or
twenty-five thousand dollars, but in no event greater than one hundred thousand
dollars or the amount of the bank's lending limit as prescribed in section
8-141, whichever is less.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, the board
of directors of a bank may obtain a credit report from a recognized credit
agency, on an annual basis, for any or all of its executive officers.
(b) Subdivision (a) of this subsection does not apply to any executive
officer if such officer is excluded by a resolution of the board of directors
or by the bylaws of the bank from participating in the major policymaking
functions of the bank and does not actually participate in the major
policymaking functions of the bank.
(6) No bank shall extend credit to any of its executive officers,
directors, or principal shareholders or to any related interest of such persons
in an amount that, when aggregated with the amount of all other extensions of
credit by the bank to that person and to all related interests of that person,
exceeds the lending limit of the bank as prescribed in section 8-141.
(7)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, no bank
shall extend credit to any of its executive officers, directors, or principal
shareholders or to any related interest of such persons unless the extension of
credit (i) is made on substantially the same terms, including interest rates
and collateral, as, and following credit-underwriting procedures that are not
less stringent than, those prevailing at the time for comparable transactions
by the bank with other persons that are not covered by this section and who are
not employed by the bank and (ii) does not involve more than the normal risk of
repayment or present other unfavorable features.
(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) of this subsection shall prohibit any
extension of credit made by a bank pursuant to a benefit or compensation
program under the provisions of 12 C.F.R. 215.4(a)(2), as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2025 2024.
(8) For purposes of this section:
(a) Executive officer means a person who participates or has authority to
participate, other than in the capacity of director, in the major policymaking
functions of the bank, whether or not the officer has an official title, the
title designates such officer as an assistant, or such officer is serving
without salary or other compensation. Executive officer includes the
chairperson of the board of directors, the president, all vice presidents, the
cashier, the corporate secretary, and the treasurer, unless the executive
officer is excluded by a resolution of the board of directors or by the bylaws
of the bank from participating, other than in the capacity of director, in the
major policymaking functions of the bank, and the executive officer does not
actually participate in such functions. A manager or assistant manager of a
branch of a bank shall not be considered to be an executive officer unless such
individual participates or is authorized to participate in the major
policymaking functions of the bank; and
(b) Unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus means the sum of:
(i) The total equity capital of the bank reported on its most recent
consolidated report of condition filed under section 8-166;
(ii) Any subordinated notes and debentures approved as an addition to the
bank's capital structure by the appropriate federal banking agency; and
(iii) Any valuation reserves created by charges to the bank's income
reported on its most recent consolidated report of condition filed under
section 8-166.
(9) Any executive officer, director, or principal shareholder of a bank or
any other person who intentionally violates this section or who aids, abets, or
assists in a violation of this section is guilty of a Class IV felony.
(10) The Director of Banking and Finance may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out this section, including rules and regulations
defining or further defining terms used in this section, consistent with the
provisions of 12 U.S.C. 84 and implementing Regulation O as such section and
regulation existed on January 1, 2025 2024.
Sec. 5. Section 8-157, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended to
read:
-5-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
8-157 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 8-2103,
the general business of every bank shall be transacted at the place of business
specified in its charter.
(2)(a)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(a)(ii) of this section,
with the approval of the director, any bank located in this state may establish
and maintain in this state an unlimited number of branches at which all banking
transactions allowed by law may be made.
(ii) Any bank that owns or controls more than twenty-two percent of the
total deposits in Nebraska, as described in subdivision (2)(c) of section 8-910
and computed in accordance with subsection (3) of section 8-910, or any bank
that is a subsidiary of a bank holding company that owns or controls more than
twenty-two percent of the total deposits in Nebraska, as described in
subdivision (2)(c) of section 8-910 and computed in accordance with subsection
(3) of section 8-910, shall not establish and maintain an unlimited number of
branches as provided in subdivision (2)(a)(i) of this section. With the
approval of the director, a bank as described in this subdivision may establish
and maintain in the county in which the main office of such bank is located an
unlimited number of branches at which all banking transactions allowed by law
may be made, except that if the main office of such bank is located in a Class
I or Class III county, such bank may establish and maintain in Class I and
Class III counties an unlimited number of branches at which all banking
transactions allowed by law may be made.
(iii) Any bank which establishes and maintains branches pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a)(i) of this section and which subsequently becomes a bank as
described in subdivision (2)(a)(ii) of this section shall not be subject to the
limitations as to location of branches contained in subdivision (2)(a)(ii) of
this section with regard to any such established branch and shall continue to
be entitled to maintain any such established branch as if such bank had not
become a bank as described in subdivision (2)(a)(ii) of this section.
(b) With the approval of the director, any bank or any branch may
establish and maintain a mobile branch at which all banking transactions
allowed by law may be made. Such mobile branch may consist of one or more
vehicles which may transact business only within the county in which such bank
or such branch is located and within counties in this state which adjoin such
county.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Class I county means a county in this state with a population of four
hundred thousand or more as determined by the most recent federal decennial
census;
(ii) Class II county means a county in this state with a population of at
least two hundred thousand and less than four hundred thousand as determined by
the most recent federal decennial census;
(iii) Class III county means a county in this state with a population of
at least one hundred thousand and less than two hundred thousand as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census; and
(iv) Class IV county means a county in this state with a population of
less than one hundred thousand as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census.
(3) With the approval of the director, a bank may establish and maintain
branches acquired pursuant to section 8-1506 or 8-1516. All banking
transactions allowed by law may be made at such branches.
(4) With the approval of the director, a bank may acquire the assets and
assume the deposits of a branch of another financial institution in Nebraska if
the acquired branch is converted to a branch of the acquiring bank. All banking
transactions allowed by law may be made at a branch acquired pursuant to this
subsection.
(5) With the approval of the director, a bank may establish a branch
pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 8-115.01. All banking transactions
allowed by law may be made at such branch.
(6) The name given to any branch established and maintained pursuant to
this section shall not be substantially similar to the name of any existing
bank or branch which is unaffiliated with the newly created branch and is
located in the same city, village, or county. The name of such newly created
branch shall be approved by the director.
(7) A bank which has a main chartered office or an approved branch located
in the State of Nebraska may, through any of its executive officers, including
executive officers licensed as such pursuant to section 8-139, or designated
agents, conduct a loan closing at a location other than the place of business
specified in the bank's charter or any branch thereof.
(8) A bank which has a main chartered office or approved branch located in
the State of Nebraska may, upon notification to the department, establish
savings account programs at any elementary or secondary school, whether public
or private, that has students who reside in the same city or village as the
main chartered office or branch of the bank, or, if the main office of the bank
is located in an unincorporated area of a county, at any school that has
students who reside in the same unincorporated area. The savings account
programs shall be limited to the establishment of individual student accounts
and the receipt of deposits for such accounts.
(9) Upon receiving an application for a branch to be established pursuant
to subdivision (2)(a) of this section, to establish a mobile branch pursuant to
subdivision (2)(b) of this section, to acquire a branch of another financial
institution pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, to establish or acquire
a branch pursuant to subsection (1) of section 8-2103, or to move the location
-6-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
of an established branch other than a move made pursuant to subdivision (6) of
section 8-115.01, the director shall hold a public hearing on the matter if he
or she determines, in his or her discretion, that the condition of the
applicant bank warrants a hearing. If the director determines that the
condition of the bank does not warrant a hearing, the director shall notify the
applicant bank of such, and the applicant bank shall publish a notice, in a
form prescribed by the director, of the filing of the application in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the proposed branch or
mobile branch would be located, the expense of which shall be paid by the
applicant bank. The applicant bank shall submit to the director (a) an
affidavit of publication from the newspaper showing that the notice was
published and (b) proof that the bank has paid the expense of publication. If
the director receives any substantive objection to the proposed branch or
mobile branch within fifteen days after publication of such notice, he or she
shall hold a hearing on the application. Notice of a hearing held pursuant to
this subsection shall be published for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county where the proposed branch or mobile branch
would be located. The date for hearing the application shall not be more than
ninety days after the filing of the application and not less than thirty days
after the last publication of notice of hearing. The expense of any publication
required by this section shall be paid by the applicant but payment shall not
be a condition precedent to approval by the director.
Sec. 6. Section 8-157.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-157.01 (1) Any establishing financial institution may establish and
maintain any number of automatic teller machines at which all banking
transactions, defined as receiving deposits of every kind and nature and
crediting such to customer accounts, cashing checks and cash withdrawals,
transferring funds from checking accounts to savings accounts, transferring
funds from savings accounts to checking accounts, transferring funds from
either checking accounts and savings accounts to accounts of other customers,
transferring payments from customer accounts into accounts maintained by other
customers of the financial institution or the financial institution, including
preauthorized draft authority, preauthorized loans, and credit transactions,
receiving payments payable at the financial institution or otherwise, account
balance inquiry, and any other transaction incidental to the business of the
financial institution or which will provide a benefit to the financial
institution's customers or the general public, may be conducted. Any automatic
teller machine owned by a nonfinancial institution third party shall be
sponsored by an establishing financial institution. Neither such automatic
teller machines nor the transactions conducted thereat shall be construed as
the establishment of a branch or as branch banking.
(2) Any financial institution may become a user financial institution by
agreeing to pay the establishing financial institution the automatic teller
machine usage fee. Such agreement shall be implied by the use of such automatic
teller machines.
(3)(a)(i) All automatic teller machines shall be made available on a
nondiscriminating basis for use by Nebraska customers of a user financial
institution and (ii) all Nebraska automatic teller machine transactions
initiated by Nebraska customers of a user financial institution shall be made
on a nondiscriminating basis.
(b) It shall not be deemed discrimination if (i) an automatic teller
machine does not offer the same transaction services as other automatic teller
machines, (ii) there are no automatic teller machine usage fees charged between
affiliate financial institutions for the use of automatic teller machines,
(iii) the automatic teller machine usage fees of an establishing financial
institution that authorizes and directly or indirectly routes Nebraska
automatic teller machine transactions to multiple switches, all of which comply
with the requirements of subdivision (3)(d) of this section, differ solely
based upon the fees established by the switches, (iv) automatic teller machine
usage fees differ based upon whether the transaction initiated at an automatic
teller machine is subject to a surcharge or provided on a surcharge-free basis,
or (v) the automatic teller machines established or sponsored by an
establishing financial institution are made available for use by Nebraska
customers of any user financial institution which agrees to pay the automatic
teller machine usage fee and which conforms to the operating rules and
technical standards established by the switch to which a Nebraska automatic
teller machine transaction is directly or indirectly routed.
(c) The director, upon notice and after a hearing, may terminate or
suspend the use of any automatic teller machine if he or she determines that
the automatic teller machine is not made available on a nondiscriminating basis
or that Nebraska automatic teller machine transactions initiated at such
automatic teller machine are not made on a nondiscriminating basis.
(d) A switch (i) shall provide to all financial institutions that have a
main office or approved branch located in the State of Nebraska and that
conform to the operating rules and technical standards established by the
switch an equal opportunity to participate in the switch for the use of and
access thereto; (ii) shall be capable of operating to accept and route Nebraska
automatic teller machine transactions, whether receiving data from an automatic
teller machine, an establishing financial institution, or a data processing
center; and (iii) shall be capable of being directly or indirectly connected to
every data processing center for any automatic teller machine.
(e) The director, upon notice and after a hearing, may terminate or
-7-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
suspend the operation of any switch with respect to all Nebraska automatic
teller machine transactions if he or she determines that the switch is not
being operated in the manner required under subdivision (3)(d) of this section.
(f) Subject to the requirement for a financial institution to comply with
this subsection, no user financial institution or establishing financial
institution shall be required to become a member of any particular switch.
(4) Any consumer initiating an electronic funds transfer at an automatic
teller machine for which an automatic teller machine surcharge will be imposed
shall receive notice in accordance with the provisions of 15 U.S.C. 1693b(d)(3)
(A) and (B), as such section existed on January 1, 2025 2024. Such notice shall
appear on the screen of the automatic teller machine or appear on a paper
notice issued from such machine after the transaction is initiated and before
the consumer is irrevocably committed to completing the transaction.
(5) A point-of-sale terminal may be established at any point within this
state by a financial institution, a group of two or more financial
institutions, or a combination of a financial institution or financial
institutions and a third party or parties. Such parties may contract with a
seller of goods and services or any other third party for the operation of
point-of-sale terminals.
(6) A seller of goods and services or any other third party on whose
premises one or more point-of-sale terminals are established shall not be,
solely by virtue of such establishment, a financial institution and shall not
be subject to the laws governing, or other requirements imposed on, financial
institutions, except for the requirement that it faithfully perform its
obligations in connection with any transaction originated at any point-of-sale
terminal on its premises.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit nonbank
employees from assisting in transactions originated at automatic teller
machines or point-of-sale terminals, and such assistance shall not be deemed to
be engaging in the business of banking.
(8)(a) Annually by September 1, any entity operating as a switch in
Nebraska shall file a notice with the department setting forth its name,
address, and contact information for an officer authorized to answer inquiries
related to its operations in Nebraska.
(b) Any entity intending to operate in Nebraska as a switch shall file a
notice with the department setting forth its name, address, and contact
information for an officer authorized to answer inquiries related to its
operations in Nebraska. Such notice shall be filed at least thirty days prior
to the date on which the switch commences operations, and thereafter annually
by September 1.
(9) Nothing in this section prohibits ordinary clearinghouse transactions
between financial institutions.
(10) Nothing in this section shall prevent any financial institution which
has a main chartered office or an approved branch located in the State of
Nebraska from participating in a national automatic teller machine program to
allow its customers to use automatic teller machines located outside of the
State of Nebraska which are established by out-of-state financial institutions
or foreign financial institutions or to allow customers of out-of-state
financial institutions or foreign financial institutions to use its automatic
teller machines. Such participation and any automatic teller machine usage fees
charged or received pursuant to the national automatic teller machine program
or usage fees charged for the use of its automatic teller machines by customers
of out-of-state financial institutions or foreign financial institutions shall
not be considered for purposes of determining (a) if an automatic teller
machine has been made available or Nebraska automatic teller machine
transactions have been made on a nondiscriminating basis for use by Nebraska
customers of a user financial institution or (b) if a switch complies with
subdivision (3)(d) of this section.
(11) An agreement to operate or share an automatic teller machine may not
prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of the operator or owner of the
automatic teller machine to charge a customer conducting a transaction using an
account from a foreign financial institution an access fee or surcharge not
otherwise prohibited under state or federal law.
(12) Switch fees shall not be subject to this section or be regulated by
the department.
(13) Nothing in this section shall prevent a group of two or more credit
unions, each of which has a main chartered office or an approved branch located
in the State of Nebraska, from participating in a credit union service
organization organized on or before January 1, 2015, for the purpose of owning
automatic teller machines, provided that all participating credit unions have
an ownership interest in the credit union service organization and that the
credit union service organization has an ownership interest in each of the
participating credit unions' automatic teller machines. Such participation and
any automatic teller machine usage fees associated with Nebraska automatic
teller machine transactions initiated by customers of participating credit
unions at such automatic teller machines shall not be considered for purposes
of determining if such automatic teller machines have been made available on a
nondiscriminating basis or if Nebraska automatic teller machine transactions
initiated at such automatic teller machines have been made on a
nondiscriminating basis, provided that all Nebraska automatic teller machine
transactions initiated by customers of participating credit unions result in
the same automatic teller machine usage fees for essentially the same service
routed over the same switch.
-8-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
(14) Nebraska automatic teller machine usage fees and any agreements
relating to Nebraska automatic teller machine usage fees shall comply with
subsection (3) of this section.
(15) For purposes of this section:
(a) Access means the ability to utilize an automatic teller machine or a
point-of-sale terminal to conduct permitted banking transactions or purchase
goods and services electronically;
(b) Account means a checking account, a savings account, a share account,
or any other customer asset account held by a financial institution. Such an
account may also include a line of credit which a financial institution has
agreed to extend to its customer;
(c) Affiliate financial institution means any financial institution which
is a subsidiary of the same bank holding company;
(d) Automatic teller machine usage fee means any per transaction fee
established by a switch or otherwise established on behalf of an establishing
financial institution and collected from the user financial institution and
paid to the establishing financial institution for the use of the automatic
teller machine. An automatic teller machine usage fee shall not include switch
fees;
(e) Electronic funds transfer means any transfer of funds, other than a
transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is
initiated through a point-of-sale terminal, an automatic teller machine, or a
personal terminal for the purpose of ordering, instructing, or authorizing a
financial institution to debit or credit an account;
(f) Essentially the same service means the same Nebraska automatic teller
machine transaction offered by an establishing financial institution
irrespective of the user financial institution, the Nebraska customer of which
initiates the Nebraska automatic teller machine transaction. A Nebraska
automatic teller machine transaction that is subject to a surcharge is not
essentially the same service as the same banking transaction for which a
surcharge is not imposed;
(g) Establishing financial institution means any financial institution
which has a main chartered office or approved branch located in the State of
Nebraska that establishes or sponsors an automatic teller machine or any out-
of-state financial institution that establishes or sponsors an automatic teller
machine;
(h) Financial institution means a bank, savings bank, building and loan
association, savings and loan association, or credit union, whether chartered
by the department, the United States, or a foreign state agency; any other
similar organization which is covered by federal deposit insurance; or a
subsidiary of any such entity;
(i) Foreign financial institution means a financial institution located
outside the United States;
(j) Nebraska automatic teller machine transaction means a banking
transaction as defined in subsection (1) of this section which is (i) initiated
at an automatic teller machine established in whole or in part or sponsored by
an establishing financial institution, (ii) for an account of a Nebraska
customer of a user financial institution, and (iii) processed through a switch
regardless of whether it is routed directly or indirectly from an automatic
teller machine;
(k) Personal terminal means a personal computer and telephone, wherever
located, operated by a customer of a financial institution for the purpose of
initiating a transaction affecting an account of the customer;
(l) Sponsoring an automatic teller machine means the acceptance of
responsibility by an establishing financial institution for compliance with all
provisions of law governing automatic teller machines and Nebraska automatic
teller machine transactions in connection with an automatic teller machine
owned by a nonfinancial institution third party;
(m) Switch fee means a fee established by a switch and assessed to a user
financial institution or to an establishing financial institution other than an
automatic teller machine usage fee; and
(n) User financial institution means any financial institution which has a
main chartered office or approved branch located in the State of Nebraska which
avails itself of and provides its customers with automatic teller machine
services.
Sec. 7. Section 8-183.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-183.04 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Banking
Act or any other Nebraska law, a state or federal savings association which was
formed and in operation as a mutual savings association as of July 15, 1998,
may elect to retain its mutual form of corporate organization upon conversion
to a state bank.
(2) All references to shareholders or stockholders for state banks shall
be deemed to be references to members for such a converted savings association.
(3) The amount and type of capital required for such a converted savings
association shall be as required for federal mutual savings associations in 12
C.F.R. 5.21, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025 2024, except that if
at any time the department determines that the capital of such a converted
savings association is impaired, the director may require the members to make
up the capital impairment.
(4) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing
such converted mutual savings associations. In adopting and promulgating such
rules and regulations, the director may consider the provisions of sections
-9-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
8-301 to 8-384 governing savings associations in mutual form of corporate
organization.
Sec. 8. Section 8-1,140, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-1,140 Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of the Nebraska
Banking Act or any other Nebraska statute, any bank incorporated under the laws
of this state and organized under the provisions of the act, or under the laws
of this state as they existed prior to May 9, 1933, shall directly, or
indirectly through a department, a subsidiary, or subsidiaries, have all the
rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities which may be exercised as
of January 1, 2025 2024, by a federally chartered bank doing business in
Nebraska, including the exercise of all powers and activities that are
permitted for a financial subsidiary of a federally chartered bank. Such
rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities shall not relieve such
bank from payment of state taxes assessed under any applicable laws of this
state.
Sec. 9. Section 8-226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended to
read:
8-226 (1) No individual, firm, corporation, or association doing business
directly or indirectly in the State of Nebraska shall use the words trust,
trust company, trust association, or trust fund as any part of its title
except:
(a) A trust company as defined in section 8-230;
(b) A trust company chartered and supervised under the laws of the United
States or any other state;
(c) A bank or savings association chartered and supervised under the laws
of the United States or any other state, if such bank or savings association
has been further chartered to conduct a trust company business;
(d) An entity with a pending application for a trust company chartered
under the Nebraska Trust Company Act, provided that if the entity's application
is withdrawn or denied, the entity shall cease using the words trust, trust
company, trust association, or trust fund as any part of its title within
thirty days after the withdrawal or denial of the application;
(e) (d) A limited partnership to the extent authorized by subdivision (5)
of section 67-234;
(f) (e) An entity required by any other law to use such words; or
(g) (f) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section:
(a) An organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code and exempt from taxation under section 501(a) of the code may use the
words trust or trust fund;
(b) A trust created by a testamentary or fiduciary document may use the
word trust; and
(c) An account in a financial institution established by or on behalf of
trusts referenced in subdivision (b) of this subsection may use the words trust
or trust fund.
(3) A violation of this section is a Class V misdemeanor.
Sec. 10. Section 8-305, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-305 The words loan and building association, building association,
building and loan association, savings and loan association, or loan and
savings association, shall form part of the corporate name of every such
corporation. No person individual, firm, company, corporation, or association
operating in the State of Nebraska, unless (1) organized under authority of the
federal government, (2) organized as a building and loan association under the
authority of any foreign state and complying with the provisions of the
Nebraska statutes, (3) organized and incorporated under and in accordance with
the provisions of sections 8-301 to 8-384, or (4) having been in existence and
doing business in Nebraska under its present name for a period of ten years
prior to January 1, 1949, shall, after August 27, 1949, use in its name the
words loan and building association, building and loan association, savings and
loan association, loan and savings association, loan and building, building and
loan, savings and loan, loan and savings, building and savings, or savings and
building, in combination with any other word or words, except that an entity
with a pending application for a loan and building association, building
association, building and loan association, savings and loan association, or
loan and savings association may use the words loan and building association,
building association, building and loan association, savings and loan
association, or loan and savings association as part of the corporate name of
such entity, provided that if the entity's application is withdrawn or denied,
the entity shall cease using the words loan and building association, building
association, building and loan association, savings and loan association, or
loan and savings association, as any part of its corporate name within thirty
days after the withdrawal or denial of the application. Any person, firm,
company, corporation, or association violating this section shall be guilty of
a Class V misdemeanor for each offense. Each day such person, firm, or
corporation shall use any such prohibited words shall be deemed a separate and
distinct offense in violation of this section.
Sec. 11. Section 8-318, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-318 (1)(a) Shares of stock in any association, or in any federal savings
and loan association incorporated under the provisions of the federal Home
Owners' Loan Act, with its principal office and place of business in this
-10-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
state, may be subscribed for, held, transferred, surrendered, withdrawn, and
forfeited and payments thereon received and receipted for by any person,
regardless of age, in the same manner and with the same binding effect as
though such person were of the age of majority, except that a minor or his or
her estate shall not be bound on his or her subscription to stock except to the
extent of payments actually made thereon.
(b) Whenever a share account is accepted by any building and loan
association in the name of any person, regardless of age, the deposit may be
withdrawn by the shareholder by any of the following methods:
(i) Check or other instrument in writing. The check or other instrument in
writing constitutes a receipt or acquittance if the check or other instrument
in writing is signed by the shareholder and constitutes a valid release in
discharge to the building and loan association for all payments so made; or
(ii) Electronic means through:
(A) Preauthorized direct withdrawal;
(B) An automatic teller machine;
(C) A debit card;
(D) A transfer by telephone;
(E) A network, including the Internet; or
(F) Any electronic terminal, computer, magnetic tape, or other electronic
means.
(c) This section shall not be construed to affect the rights, liabilities,
or responsibilities of participants in an electronic fund transfer under the
federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693 et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025 2024, and shall not affect the legal relationships between a
minor and any person other than the building and loan association.
(2) All trustees, guardians, personal representatives, administrators, and
conservators appointed by the courts of this state may invest and reinvest in,
acquire, make withdrawals in whole or in part, hold, transfer, or make new or
additional investments in or transfers of shares of stock in any (a) building
and loan association organized under the laws of the State of Nebraska or (b)
federal savings and loan association incorporated under the provisions of the
federal Home Owners' Loan Act, having its principal office and place of
business in this state, without an order of approval from any court.
(3) Trustees created solely by the terms of a trust instrument may invest
in, acquire, hold, and transfer such shares, and make withdrawals, in whole or
in part, therefrom, without any order of court, unless expressly limited,
restricted, or prohibited therefrom by the terms of such trust instrument.
(4) All building and loan associations referred to in this section are
qualified to act as trustee or custodian within the provisions of the federal
Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962, as amended, or under the
terms and provisions of section 408(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, if the
provisions of such retirement plan require the funds of such trust or
custodianship to be invested exclusively in shares or accounts in the
association or in other associations. If any such retirement plan, within the
judgment of the association, constitutes a qualified plan under the federal
Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962, or under the terms and
provisions of section 408(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, and the regulations
promulgated thereunder at the time the trust was established and accepted by
the association, is subsequently determined not to be such a qualified plan or
subsequently ceases to be such a qualified plan, in whole or in part, the
association may continue to act as trustee of any deposits theretofore made
under such plan and to dispose of the same in accordance with the directions of
the member and beneficiaries thereof. No association, in respect to savings
made under this section, shall be required to segregate such savings from other
assets of the association. The association shall keep appropriate records
showing in proper detail all transactions engaged in under the authority of
this section.
Sec. 12. Section 8-355, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-355 Notwithstanding any of the provisions of Chapter 8, article 3, or
any other Nebraska statute, except as provided in section 8-345.02, any
association incorporated under the laws of the State of Nebraska and organized
under the provisions of such article shall have all the rights, powers,
privileges, benefits, and immunities which may be exercised as of January 1,
2025 2024, by a federal savings and loan association doing business in
Nebraska. Such rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities shall not
relieve such association from payment of state taxes assessed under any
applicable laws of this state.
Sec. 13. Section 8-1101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-1101 For purposes of the Securities Act of Nebraska, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Agent means any individual other than a broker-dealer who represents a
broker-dealer or issuer in effecting or attempting to effect sales of
securities, but agent does not include an individual who represents (a) an
issuer in (i) effecting a transaction in a security exempted by subdivision
(6), (7), or (8) of section 8-1110, (ii) effecting certain transactions
exempted by section 8-1111, (iii) effecting transactions in a federal covered
security as described in section 18(b)(3) of the Securities Act of 1933, or
(iv) effecting transactions with existing employees, limited liability company
members, partners, or directors of the issuer or any of its subsidiaries if no
commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for
-11-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
soliciting any person in this state or (b) a broker-dealer in effecting
transactions described in section 15(h)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934. A partner, limited liability company member, officer, or director of a
broker-dealer is an agent only if he or she otherwise comes within this
definition;
(2) Broker-dealer means any person engaged in the business of effecting
transactions in securities for the account of others or for his or her own
account. Broker-dealer does not include (a) an issuer-dealer, agent, bank,
savings institution, or trust company, (b) an issuer effecting a transaction in
its own security exempted by subdivision (5)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of
section 8-1110 or which qualifies as a federal covered security pursuant to
section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933, (c) a person who has no place
of business in this state if he or she effects transactions in this state
exclusively with or through the issuers of the securities involved in the
transactions, other broker-dealers, or banks, savings institutions, credit
unions, trust companies, insurance companies, investment companies as defined
in the Investment Company Act of 1940, pension or profit-sharing trusts, or
other financial institutions or institutional buyers, whether acting for
themselves or as trustees, (d) a person who is registered as a broker-dealer
with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934 and has no place of business in this state if during any period of
twelve consecutive months he or she does not effect transactions in securities
or offer to effect transactions with more than five people in direct more than
five offers to sell or to buy into this state in any manner to persons other
than those specified in subdivision (2)(c) of this section, or (e) a person who
is a resident of Canada and who has no office or other physical presence in
Nebraska if the following conditions are satisfied: (i) The person must be
registered with, or be a member of, a securities self-regulatory organization
in Canada or a stock exchange in Canada; (ii) the person must maintain, in good
standing, its provisional or territorial registration or membership in a
securities self-regulatory organization in Canada, or stock exchange in Canada;
(iii) the person effects, or attempts to effect, (A) a transaction with or for
a Canadian client who is temporarily present in this state and with whom the
Canadian broker-dealer had a bona fide customer relationship before the client
entered this state or (B) a transaction with or for a Canadian client in a
self-directed tax advantaged retirement plan in Canada of which that client is
the holder or contributor; and (iv) the person complies with all provisions of
the Securities Act of Nebraska relating to the disclosure of material
information in connection with the transaction;
(3) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance. Director means
the Director of Banking and Finance of the State of Nebraska except as further
provided in section 8-1120;
(4) Federal covered adviser means a person who is registered under section
203 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940;
(5) Federal covered security means any security described as a covered
security under section 18(b) of the Securities Act of 1933 or rules and
regulations under the act;
(6) Guaranteed means guaranteed as to payment of principal, interest, or
dividends;
(7) Investment adviser means any person who for compensation engages in
the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or
writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing
in, purchasing, or selling securities or who for compensation and as a part of
a regular business issues or promulgates analyses or reports concerning
securities. Investment adviser also includes financial planners and other
persons who, as an integral component of other financially related services,
provide the foregoing investment advisory services to others for compensation
and as part of a business or who hold themselves out as providing the foregoing
investment advisory services to others for compensation. Investment adviser
does not include (a) an investment adviser representative, (b) a bank, savings
institution, or trust company, (c) a lawyer, accountant, engineer, or teacher
whose performance of these services is solely incidental to the practice of his
or her profession, (d) a broker-dealer or its agent whose performance of these
services is solely incidental to its business as a broker-dealer and who
receives no special compensation for them, (e) an issuer-dealer, (f) a
publisher of any bona fide newspaper, news column, newsletter, news magazine,
or business or financial publication or service, whether communicated in hard
copy form, by electronic means, or otherwise which does not consist of the
rendering of advice on the basis of the specific investment situation of each
client, (g) a person who has no place of business in this state if (i) his or
her only clients in this state are other investment advisers, federal covered
advisers, broker-dealers, banks, savings institutions, credit unions, trust
companies, insurance companies, investment companies as defined in the
Investment Company Act of 1940, pension or profit-sharing trusts, or other
financial institutions or institutional buyers, whether acting for themselves
or as trustees, or (ii) during the preceding twelve-month period, he or she has
had five or fewer clients who are residents of this state other than those
persons specified in subdivision (g)(i) of this subdivision, (h) any person
that is a federal covered adviser or is excluded from the definition of
investment adviser under section 202 of the Investment Adviser Act of 1940, or
(i) such other persons not within the intent of this subdivision as the
director may by rule and regulation or order designate;
(8) Investment adviser representative means any partner, limited liability
-12-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
company member, officer, or director or any person occupying a similar status
or performing similar functions of a partner, limited liability company member,
officer, or director or other individual, except clerical or ministerial
personnel, who is employed by or associated with an investment adviser that is
registered or required to be registered under the Securities Act of Nebraska or
who has a place of business located in this state and is employed by or
associated with a federal covered adviser, and who (a) makes any
recommendations or otherwise renders advice regarding securities, (b) manages
accounts or portfolios of clients, (c) determines which recommendation or
advice regarding securities should be given, (d) solicits, offers, or
negotiates for the sale of or sells investment advisory services, or (e)
supervises employees who perform any of the foregoing;
(9) Issuer means any person who issues or proposes to issue any security,
except that (a) with respect to certificates of deposit, voting-trust
certificates, or collateral-trust certificates or with respect to certificates
of interest or shares in an unincorporated investment trust not having a board
of directors, or persons performing similar functions, or of the fixed,
restricted management, or unit type, the term issuer means the person or
persons performing the acts and assuming the duties of depositor or manager
pursuant to the provisions of the trust or other agreement or instrument under
which the security is issued and (b) with respect to a fractional or pooled
interest in a viatical settlement contract, issuer means the person who
creates, for the purpose of sale, the fractional or pooled interest. In the
case of a viatical settlement contract that is not fractionalized or pooled,
issuer means the person effecting a transaction with a purchaser of such
contract;
(10) Issuer-dealer means (a) any issuer located in the State of Nebraska
or (b) any issuer which registered its securities by qualification who proposes
to sell to the public of the State of Nebraska the securities that it issues
without the benefit of another registered broker-dealer. Such securities shall
have been approved for sale in the State of Nebraska pursuant to section
8-1104;
(11) Nonissuer means not directly or indirectly for the benefit of the
issuer;
(12) Person means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited
liability company, an association, a joint-stock company, a trust in which the
interests of the beneficiaries are evidenced by a security, an unincorporated
organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government;
(13) Sale or sell includes every contract of sale of, contract to sell, or
disposition of a security or interest in a security for value. Offer or offer
to sell includes every attempt or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an
offer to buy, a security or interest in a security for value. Any security
given or delivered with or as a bonus on account of any purchase of securities
or any other thing is considered to constitute part of the subject of the
purchase and to have been offered and sold for value. A purported gift of
assessable stock shall be considered to involve an offer and sale. Every sale
or offer of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of
the same or another issuer, as well as every sale or offer of a security which
gives the holder a present or future right or privilege to convert into another
security of the same or another issuer, shall be considered to include an offer
of the other security;
(14) Securities Act of 1933, Securities Exchange Act of 1934, Investment
Advisers Act of 1940, Investment Company Act of 1940, Commodity Exchange Act,
and the federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act means the acts as
they existed on January 1, 2024;
(14) (15) Security means any note, stock, treasury stock, bond, debenture,
units of beneficial interest in a real estate trust, evidence of indebtedness,
certificate of interest or participation in any profit-sharing agreement,
collateral-trust certificate, preorganization certificate or subscription,
transferable share, investment contract, viatical settlement contract or any
fractional or pooled interest in such contract, membership interest in any
limited liability company organized under Nebraska law or any other
jurisdiction unless otherwise excluded from this definition, voting-trust
certificate, certificate of deposit for a security, certificate of interest or
participation in an oil, gas, or mining title or lease or in payments out of
production under such a title or lease, in general any interest or instrument
commonly known as a security, or any certificate of interest or participation
in, temporary or interim certificate for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to
subscribe to or purchase any of the foregoing. Security does not include any
insurance or endowment policy or annuity contract issued by an insurance
company. Security also does not include a membership interest in a limited
liability company when all of the following exist: (a) The member enters into a
written commitment to be engaged actively and directly in the management of the
limited liability company; and (b) all members of the limited liability company
are actively engaged in the management of the limited liability company. For
the limited purposes of determining professional malpractice insurance
premiums, a security issued through a transaction that is exempted pursuant to
subdivision (23) of section 8-1111 shall not be considered a security;
(15) (16) State means any state, territory, or possession of the United
States as well as the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico; and
(16) (17) Viatical settlement contract means an agreement for the
purchase, sale, assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest of all or any portion
of the death benefit or ownership of a life insurance policy or contract for
-13-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
consideration which is less than the expected death benefit of the life
insurance policy or contract. Viatical settlement contract does not include (a)
the assignment, transfer, sale, devise, or bequest of a death benefit of a life
insurance policy or contract made by the viator to an insurance company or to a
viatical settlement provider or broker licensed pursuant to the Viatical
Settlements Act, (b) the assignment of a life insurance policy or contract to a
bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or other
licensed lending institution as collateral for a loan, or (c) the exercise of
accelerated benefits pursuant to the terms of a life insurance policy or
contract and consistent with applicable law.
Sec. 14. Section 8-1101.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
8-1101.01 For purposes of the Securities Act of Nebraska:
(1) Fair practice or ethical rules or standards promulgated by the
Securities and Exchange Commission, the Financial Industry Regulatory
Authority, or a self-regulatory organization approved by the Securities and
Exchange Commission means such practice, rules, or standards as they existed on
January 1, 2025;
(2) (1) Federal rules and regulations adopted under the Investment
Advisers Act of 1940 or the Securities Act of 1933 means such rules and
regulations as they existed on January 1, 2025 2024; and
(3) Securities Act of 1933, Securities Exchange Act of 1934, Investment
Advisers Act of 1940, Investment Company Act of 1940, Commodity Exchange Act,
and the federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act means the acts as
they existed on January 1, 2025.
(2) Fair practice or ethical rules or standards promulgated by the
Securities and Exchange Commission, the Financial Industry Regulatory
Authority, or a self-regulatory organization approved by the Securities and
Exchange Commission means such practice, rules, or standards as they existed on
January 1, 2024.
Sec. 15. Section 8-1506, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-1506 (1) Whenever the Department of Banking and Finance determines the
acquisition of any financial institution chartered under the laws of Nebraska
is necessary because its capital is impaired, it is conducting its business in
an unsafe or unauthorized manner, or it is endangering the interest of
depositors or savers, the Director of Banking and Finance may take immediate
action in the case of an emergency so declared by the Governor, the Secretary
of State, and the Director of Banking and Finance, without the benefit of a
hearing, to convert or merge the charter, form of ownership, or operating
powers, some or all of the assets and liabilities, or one or more of the
branches of the financial institution into the charter, form of ownership, or
operating powers of one or more financial institutions to facilitate the
acquisition. Such In the case of a financial institution chartered under the
laws of Nebraska, such immediate action may include the ability by the director
to take possession of the institution.
(2) In the case of a financial institution chartered by the United States
or a foreign state agency as defined in section 8-101.03 and upon receipt of
notice by the director from the financial institution's primary state or
federal regulator that the acquisition of the financial institution is
necessary because (a) the financial institution's capital is impaired, (b) the
financial institution is conducting business in an unsafe or unauthorized
manner, or (c) the financial institution is endangering the interest of
depositors or savers, the director may take immediate action without the
benefit of a hearing, to convert or merge the charter, form of ownership, or
operating powers, some or all of the assets and liabilities, or one or more of
the branches of the financial institution into the charter, form of ownership,
or operating powers of one or more financial institutions chartered under the
laws of Nebraska to facilitate the acquisition.
(3) (2) Any stockholder, depositor, or creditor of any state-chartered
financial institution chartered under the laws of Nebraska shall, upon
application to the director within five days of the entry of the order, be
afforded a hearing relating to the department's order and determination not
later than ten days after such application has been filed. On the basis of such
hearing, the director shall enter a final order which may continue the original
order in effect, revoke it, or modify it. Any person aggrieved by a final order
of the director made pursuant to this section may appeal the order by filing,
within ten days after the entry of the final order, a written petition praying
that the final order be modified or set aside in whole or in part. Upon service
of the petition, the director shall within fifteen days certify and file in
such court a copy of the original order, the application for hearing, all
exhibits and testimony, and the final order from which the appeal is taken.
Such appeal shall otherwise be governed by the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 16. Section 8-1704, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-1704 CFTC rule shall mean any rule, regulation, or order of the
Commodity Futures Trading Commission in effect on January 1, 2025 2024.
Sec. 17. Section 8-1707, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-1707 Commodity Exchange Act shall mean the act of Congress known as the
Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. 1, as amended on January 1, 2025 2024.
Sec. 18. Section 8-2724, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
-14-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
8-2724 (1) The requirement for a license under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act does not apply to:
(a) The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof;
(b) Any post office of the United States Postal Service;
(c) A state or any political subdivision thereof;
(d)(i) Banks, credit unions, digital asset depository institutions as
defined in section 8-3003, building and loan associations, savings and loan
associations, savings banks, or mutual banks organized under the laws of any
state or the United States;
(ii) Subsidiaries of the institutions listed in subdivision (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(iii) Bank holding companies which have a banking subsidiary located in
Nebraska and whose debt securities have an investment grade rating by a
national rating agency; or
(iv) Authorized delegates of the institutions and entities listed in
subdivision (d)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, except that authorized
delegates that are not banks, credit unions, building and loan associations,
savings and loan associations, savings banks, mutual banks, subsidiaries of any
of the foregoing, or bank holding companies shall comply with all requirements
imposed upon authorized delegates under the act;
(e) The provision of electronic transfer of government benefits for any
federal, state, or county governmental agency, as defined in Consumer Financial
Protection Bureau Regulation E, 12 C.F.R. part 1005, as such regulation existed
on January 1, 2025 2024, by a contractor for and on behalf of the United States
or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof or any state or any
political subdivision thereof;
(f) An operator of a payment system only to the extent that the payment
system provides processing, clearing, or settlement services between or among
persons who are all exempt under this section in connection with wire
transfers, credit card transactions, debit card transactions, automated
clearinghouse transfers, or similar fund transfers; or
(g) A person, firm, corporation, or association licensed in this state and
acting within this state within the scope of a license:
(i) As a collection agency pursuant to the Collection Agency Act;
(ii) As a credit services organization pursuant to the Credit Services
Organization Act; or
(iii) To engage in the debt management business pursuant to sections
69-1201 to 69-1217.
(2) An authorized delegate of a licensee or of an exempt entity, acting
within the scope of its authority conferred by a written contract as described
in section 8-2739, is not required to obtain a license under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act, except that such an authorized delegate shall comply with the
other provisions of the act which apply to money transmission transactions.
Sec. 19. Section 8-2903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-2903 (1) When a financial institution, or an employee of a financial
institution, reasonably believes, or has received information from the
department or a law enforcement agency demonstrating that it is reasonable to
believe, that financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult may
have occurred, may have been attempted, is occurring, or is being attempted,
the financial institution may, but is not required to:
(a) Delay or refuse a transaction with or involving the vulnerable adult
or senior adult;
(b) Delay or refuse to permit the withdrawal or disbursement of funds
contained in the vulnerable adult's or senior adult's account;
(c) Prevent a change in ownership of the vulnerable adult's or senior
adult's account;
(d) Prevent a transfer of funds from the vulnerable adult's or senior
adult's account to an account owned wholly or partially by another person;
(e) Refuse to comply with instructions given to the financial institution
by an agent or a person acting for or with an agent under a power of attorney
signed or purported to have been signed by the vulnerable adult or senior
adult; or
(f) Prevent the designation or change the designation of beneficiaries to
receive any property, benefit, or contract rights for a vulnerable adult or
senior adult at death.
(2) A financial institution is not required to act under subsection (1) of
this section when provided with information alleging that financial
exploitation may have occurred, may have been attempted, is occurring, or is
being attempted, but may use the financial institution's discretion to
determine whether or not to act under subsection (1) of this section based on
the information available to the financial institution at the time.
(3)(a)(i) A financial institution may notify any third party reasonably
associated with a vulnerable adult or senior adult if the financial institution
reasonably believes that the financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult or
senior adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, is occurring, or is
being attempted.
(ii) A third party reasonably associated with a vulnerable adult or senior
adult includes, but is not limited to, the following: (A) A parent, spouse,
adult child, sibling, or other known family member or close associate of a
vulnerable adult or senior adult; (B) an authorized contact provided by a
vulnerable adult or senior adult to the financial institution; (C) a co-owner,
-15-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
additional authorized signatory, or beneficiary on a vulnerable adult's or a
senior adult's account; (D) an attorney in fact, trustee, conservator,
guardian, or other fiduciary who has been selected by a vulnerable adult or
senior adult, a court, or a third party to manage some or all of the financial
affairs of the vulnerable adult or senior adult; and (E) an attorney known to
represent or have represented the vulnerable adult or senior adult.
(b) A financial institution may choose not to notify any third party
reasonably associated with a vulnerable adult or senior adult of suspected
financial exploitation of the vulnerable adult or senior adult if the financial
institution reasonably believes the third party is, may be, or may have been
engaged in the financial exploitation of the vulnerable adult or senior adult
or if requested to refrain from making a notification by a law enforcement
agency, if such notification could interfere with a law enforcement
investigation.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a financial institution from
notifying the department or a law enforcement agency, if the financial
institution reasonably believes that the financial exploitation of a vulnerable
adult or senior adult may have occurred, may have been attempted, is occurring,
or is being attempted.
(4) The authority granted the financial institution under subsection (1)
of this section expires upon the sooner of: (a) Thirty business days after the
date on which the financial institution first acted under subsection (1) of
this section; (b) when the financial institution is satisfied that the
transaction or act will not result in financial exploitation of the vulnerable
adult or senior adult; or (c) upon termination by an order of a court of
competent jurisdiction.
(5) Unless otherwise directed by order of a court of competent
jurisdiction, a financial institution may extend the duration under subsection
(4) of this section based on a reasonable belief that the financial
exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult may continue to occur or
continue to be attempted.
(6) A financial institution and its bank holding company, if any, and any
employees, agents, officers, and directors of the financial institution and its
bank holding company, if any, shall be immune from any civil, criminal, or
administrative liability that may otherwise exist (a) for delaying or refusing
to execute a transaction, withdrawal, or disbursement, or for not delaying or
refusing to execute such transaction, withdrawal, or disbursement under this
section and (b) for actions taken in furtherance of determinations made under
subsections (1) through (5) of this section.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the refusal by a
financial institution to engage in a transaction as authorized under subsection
(1) of this section shall not constitute the wrongful dishonor of an item under
section 4-402, Uniform Commercial Code.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a reasonable belief
that payment of a check will facilitate the financial exploitation of a
vulnerable adult or senior adult shall constitute reasonable grounds to doubt
the collectability of the item for purposes of the federal Check Clearing for
the 21st Century Act, 12 U.S.C. 5001 et seq., the federal Expedited Funds
Availability Act, 12 U.S.C. 4001 et seq., and 12 C.F.R. part 229, as such acts
and part existed on January 1, 2025 2024.
Sec. 20. Section 8-3005, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-3005 (1)(a) A digital asset depository may:
(i) Make contracts as a corporation under Nebraska law;
(ii) Sue and be sued;
(iii) Receive notes as permitted by federal law;
(iv) Carry on a nonlending digital asset banking business for customers,
consistent with subdivision (2)(b) of this section;
(v) Provide payment services upon the request of a customer; and
(vi) Make an application to become a member bank of the federal reserve
system.
(b) A digital asset depository shall maintain its main office and the
primary office of its chief executive officer in Nebraska.
(c) As otherwise authorized by this section, a digital asset depository
may conduct business with customers outside this state.
(2)(a) A digital asset depository institution, consistent with the
Nebraska Financial Innovation Act, shall be organized as a corporation under
the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act to exercise the powers set forth in
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A digital asset depository institution shall not accept demand
deposits of United States currency or United States currency that may be
accessed or withdrawn by check or similar means for payment to third parties
and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a digital asset depository
institution shall not make any loans to consumers for personal, property or
household purposes, mortgage loans, or commercial loans of any fiat currency
including, but not limited to, United States currency, including the provision
of temporary credit relating to overdrafts. Notwithstanding this prohibition
against fiat currency lending by a digital asset depository institution, a
digital asset depository institution may facilitate the provision of digital
asset business services resulting from the interaction of customers with
centralized finance or decentralized finance platforms including, but not
limited to, controllable electronic record exchange, staking, controllable
electronic record lending, and controllable electronic record borrowing. A
-16-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
digital asset depository institution may purchase debt obligations specified by
subdivision (2)(c) of section 8-3009.
(c) A digital asset depository institution may open a branch in this state
or in another state in the manner set forth in section 8-157 or 8-2303. A
branch in another state is subject to the laws of the host state. A digital
asset depository institution, including any branch of the digital asset
depository institution, may only accept digital asset deposits or provide other
digital asset business services under the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act to
individual customers or a customer that is a legal entity other than a natural
person engaged in a bona fide business which is lawful under the laws of
Nebraska, the laws of the host state if the entity is headquartered in another
state, and federal law.
(3) The deposit limitations of subdivision (2)(a)(ii) of section 8-157
shall not apply to a digital asset depository.
(4) Any United States currency coming into an account established by a
customer of a digital asset depository institution shall be held in a financial
institution, the deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, which maintained a main-chartered office in this state, any branch
thereof in this state, or any branch of the financial institution which
maintained the main-chartered office in this state prior to becoming a branch
of such financial institution.
(5) A digital asset depository institution shall establish and maintain
programs for compliance with the federal Bank Secrecy Act, in accordance with
12 C.F.R. 208.63, as the act and rule existed on January 1, 2025 2024.
(6) A digital asset depository shall help meet the digital financial needs
of the communities in which it operates, consistent with safe and sound
operations, and shall maintain and update a public file available to any person
on request and on any Internet website or mobile application it maintains
containing specific information about its efforts to meet community needs,
including:
(a) The collection and reporting of data;
(b) Its policies and procedures for accepting and responding to consumer
complaints; and
(c) Its efforts to assist with financial literacy or personal finance
programs to increase knowledge and skills of Nebraska students in areas such as
digital assets, budgeting, credit, checking and savings accounts, loans,
stocks, and insurance.
Sec. 21. Section 8-3007, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-3007 (1) No customer shall open or maintain an account with a digital
asset depository or otherwise receive any services from the digital asset
depository unless the customer meets the criteria of this subsection. A
customer shall:
(a) Make sufficient evidence available to the digital asset depository to
enable compliance with anti-money laundering, customer identification, and
beneficial ownership requirements, as determined by the federal Bank Secrecy
Act guidance and the policies and practices of the institution; and
(b) If the customer is a legal entity other than a natural person:
(i) Be in good standing with the jurisdiction in the United States in
which it is incorporated or organized; and
(ii) Be engaged in a business that is lawful and bona fide in Nebraska, in
the host state, if applicable, and under federal law consistent with subsection
(3) of this section.
(2) A customer which meets the criteria of subsection (1) of this section
may be issued a digital asset depository account and otherwise receive services
from the digital asset depository, contingent on the digital asset depository
maintaining sufficient insurance under subsection (5) of section 8-3023.
(3) Consistent with subdivisions (1)(a)(iv) and (v) of section 8-3005, and
in addition to any requirements specified by federal law, a digital asset
depository shall require that any potential customer that is a legal entity
other than a natural person provide reasonable evidence that the entity is
engaged in a business that is lawful and bona fide in Nebraska, in the host
state, if applicable, and under federal law or is likely to open a lawful, bona
fide business within a federal Bank Secrecy Act compliant timeframe, as the act
existed on January 1, 2025 2024. For purposes of this subsection, reasonable
evidence includes business entity filings, articles of incorporation or
organization, bylaws, operating agreements, business plans, promotional
materials, financing agreements, or other evidence.
Sec. 22. Section 21-1725.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-1725.01 (1) Upon receiving an application to establish a new credit
union, a public hearing shall be held on each application. Notice of the filing
of the application shall be published by the department for three weeks in a
legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in the county where the
applicant proposes to operate the credit union. The date for hearing the
application shall be not less than thirty days after the last publication of
notice of hearing and not more than ninety days after filing the application
unless the applicant agrees to a later date. Notice of the filing of the
application shall be sent by the department to all financial institutions
located in the county where the applicant proposes to operate.
(2) When application is made to establish a branch of a credit union, the
director shall hold a hearing on the matter if he or she determines, in his or
her discretion, that the condition of the applicant credit union warrants a
-17-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
hearing. If the director determines that the condition of the credit union does
not warrant a hearing, the director shall notify the applicant credit union of
such and the applicant credit union shall publish a notice, in a form
prescribed by the director, of the filing of the application in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county where the proposed branch would be located.
The applicant credit union shall submit to the director (a) an affidavit of
publication from the newspaper showing that the notice was published and (b)
proof that the credit union has paid the expense of publication. If the
director receives any substantive objection to the proposed credit union branch
within fifteen days after publication of such notice, he or she shall hold a
hearing on the application. Notice of a hearing held pursuant to this
subsection shall be published for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county where the proposed branch would be located.
The date for hearing the application shall be not less than thirty days after
the last publication of notice of hearing and not more than ninety days after
the filing of the application unless the applicant agrees to a later date.
(3) The director may, in his or her discretion, hold a public hearing on
amendments to a credit union's articles of association or bylaws which are
brought before the department.
(4) The expense of any publication required by this section shall be paid
by the applicant but payment shall not be a condition precedent to approval by
the director.
Sec. 23. Section 21-1728, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
21-1728 (1) No person, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or association other than a credit union organized under the
Credit Union Act, or the Federal Credit Union Act, or the laws of any other
state, or the voluntary association of credit unions, shall use a name or title
containing the phrase "credit union " or any derivation thereof, represent
itself as a credit union, or conduct business as a credit union, except that an
entity with a pending application for a certificate of approval may use a name
or title containing the phrase credit union or any derivative thereof, provided
that if the entity's application is withdrawn or denied, the entity shall cease
using a name or title containing the phrase credit union or any derivative
thereof within thirty days after the withdrawal or denial of the application.
(2) Any violation of this section shall be a Class V misdemeanor.
(3) The director may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin
any violation of this section.
Sec. 24. Section 21-17,102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
21-17,102 (1) Funds not used in loans to members may be invested:
(a) In securities, obligations, or other instruments of or issued by or
fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States of America
or any agency or instrumentality thereof or in any trust or trusts established
for investing directly or collectively in the same;
(b) In securities, obligations, or other instruments of any state of the
United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and
the several territories organized by Congress or any political subdivision
thereof;
(c) In deposits, obligations, or other accounts of financial institutions
organized under state or federal law;
(d) In loans to or in share accounts of other credit unions or corporate
central credit unions;
(e) In obligations issued by banks for cooperatives, federal land banks,
federal intermediate credit banks, federal home loan banks, the Federal Home
Loan Bank Board, or any corporation designated in 31 U.S.C. 9101 as a wholly
owned government corporation; in obligations, participation certificates, or
other instruments of or insured by or fully guaranteed as to principal and
interest by the Federal National Mortgage Association or the Government
National Mortgage Association; in mortgages, obligations, or other securities
which are or ever have been sold by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation
pursuant to section 305 or section 306 of the Federal Home Loan Mortgage
Corporation Act, 12 U.S.C. 1454 et seq.; in obligations or other instruments or
securities of the Student Loan Marketing Association; or in obligations,
participation, securities, or other instruments of or issued by or fully
guaranteed as to principal and interest by any other agency of the United
States. A state credit union may issue and sell securities which are guaranteed
pursuant to section 306(g) of the National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. 1721(g);
(f) In participation certificates evidencing a beneficial interest in
obligations or in a right to receive interest and principal collections
therefrom, which obligations have been subjected by one or more government
agencies to a trust or trusts for which any executive department, agency, or
instrumentality of the United States or administrator thereof has been named to
act as trustee;
(g) In share accounts or deposit accounts of any corporate central credit
union in which such investments are specifically authorized by the board of
directors of the credit union making the investment;
(h) In the shares, stock, or other obligations of any other organization,
not to exceed ten percent of the credit union's capital and not to exceed five
percent of the credit union's capital in any one corporation's stock, bonds, or
other obligations, unless otherwise approved by the director. Such authority
shall not include the power to acquire control, directly or indirectly, of
another financial institution, nor invest in shares, stocks, or obligations of
-18-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
any insurance company or trade association except as otherwise expressly
provided for or approved by the director;
(i) In the capital stock of the National Credit Union Administration
Central Liquidity Facility;
(j) In obligations of or issued by any state or political subdivision
thereof, including any agency, corporation, or instrumentality of a state or
political subdivision, except that no credit union may invest more than ten
percent of its capital in the obligations of any one issuer, exclusive of
general obligations of the issuer;
(k) In securities issued pursuant to the Nebraska Business Development
Corporation Act;
(l) In participation loans with other credit unions, credit union
organizations, or other organizations; and
(m) In insurance policies and other investment products to fund employee
benefit plans for its employees, not to exceed fifteen percent of the net worth
of a credit union from a single issuer or twenty-five percent of the net worth
of a credit union in aggregate. Employee benefit plan has the same meaning as
in 29 U.S.C. 1002(3), as such section existed on January 1, 2025 2024. If the
employee benefits arrangement does not present a risk to the safety and
soundness of the domestic credit union as determined by the director, the
purchase of those investment products is not subject to the limitations of the
Credit Union Act.
(2) In addition to investments expressly permitted by the Credit Union
Act, a credit union may make any other type of investment approved by the
department by rule, regulation, or order.
Sec. 25. Section 21-17,115, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
21-17,115 Notwithstanding any of the other provisions of the Credit Union
Act or any other Nebraska statute, any credit union incorporated under the laws
of the State of Nebraska and organized under the provisions of the act shall
have all the rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities which may be
exercised as of January 1, 2025 2024, by a federal credit union doing business
in Nebraska on the condition that such rights, powers, privileges, benefits,
and immunities shall not relieve such credit union from payment of state taxes
assessed under any applicable laws of this state.
Sec. 26. Section 44-708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-708 (1) Insurers authorized to deliver or issue for delivery life
insurance policies in this state may deliver or issue for delivery one or more
funding agreements, but the delivery or issuance for delivery of funding
agreements shall not be deemed the business of insurance, life insurance or an
annuity or other line of business as set forth in section 44-201, a security as
defined in subdivision (14) (15) of section 8-1101, or receipt of gross
premiums as set forth in section 77-908. The delivery or issuance for delivery
of a funding agreement by an admitted life insurer in this state shall
constitute a lawful activity of that insurer that is reasonably related to and
incidental to its insurance activities as provided in this section. However,
this section shall not authorize any insurer to transact, under the guise of
funding agreements, any line of insurance not authorized by its certificate of
authority.
(2) No amounts shall be guaranteed or credited under any funding agreement
except upon reasonable assumptions as to investment income and expenses and on
a basis equitable to all holders of funding agreements of a given class.
(3) Amounts paid to the insurer, and proceeds applied under optional modes
of settlement, under funding agreements may be allocated by the insurer to one
or more separate accounts.
(4) The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to implement this section, including rules and regulations setting
forth the terms and conditions under which an insurer may issue funding
agreements.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director shall have
sole authority to regulate the issuance and sale of funding agreements,
including the persons selling funding agreements on behalf of insurers.
(6) Nothing in this section is intended to affect the order in which
allowed claims shall be given preference under section 44-4842. Holders of
funding agreements shall retain the priority in allowance of claims described
in subdivision (2) of section 44-4842.
(7) For purposes of this section, funding agreement means an agreement
that authorizes an admitted life insurer to accept funds and that provides for
an accumulation of those funds for the purpose of making one or more payments
at future dates in amounts that are not based on mortality or morbidity
contingencies. Funding agreement does not include any agreement in connection
with the funding of one or more payments that are excludable from the gross
income of the recipient under section 104(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 27. Section 45-101.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
45-101.04 The limitation on the rate of interest provided in section
45-101.03 shall not apply to:
(1) Other rates of interest authorized for loans made by any licensee or
permittee operating under a license or permit duly issued by the Department of
Banking and Finance pursuant to the Credit Union Act, the Nebraska Installment
Loan Act, subsection (4) of section 8-319, or sections 8-815 to 8-829;
(2) Loans made to any corporation, partnership, limited liability company,
-19-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
or trust;
(3) The guarantor or surety of any loan to a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or trust;
(4) Loans made when the aggregate principal amount of the indebtedness is
twenty-five thousand dollars or more of the borrower to any one financial
institution, licensee, or permittee;
(5) Loans insured, guaranteed, sponsored, or participated in, either in
whole or part, by any agency, department, or program of the United States or
state government;
(6) Loans or advances of money, repayable on demand, which are made solely
upon securities, as defined in subdivision (14) (15) of section 8-1101, pledged
as collateral for such repayment and in which such loans or advances are used
by the borrower only for the purchase of securities as so defined. It shall be
lawful to contract for and receive any rate of interest on such transaction as
the parties thereto may expressly agree;
(7) Interest charges made on open credit accounts by a person who sells
goods or services on credit when the interest charges do not exceed one and
one-third percent per month for any charges which remain unpaid for more than
thirty days following rendition of the statement of account;
(8) A minimum charge of ten dollars per loan which may be charged by the
lender in lieu of all interest charges;
(9) Loans described in subsection (4) of section 8-319 made by a state or
federal savings and loan association at a rate not to exceed nineteen percent
per annum;
(10) Loans made primarily for business or agricultural purposes or secured
by real property when such loans are made (a) by a licensee, registrant, or
permittee operating under a license, registration, or permit duly issued by the
Department of Banking and Finance except for licensees operating under the
Nebraska Installment Loan Act, (b) by any financial institution insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union
Administration, or (c) by any insurance company organized under the laws of
this state and subject to regulation by the Department of Insurance;
(11) Loans secured solely by real property when such loans are (a) made by
licensees operating under the Nebraska Installment Loan Act and (b) made to
finance or refinance the purchase of the property or construction on or
improvements to the property, if the Department of Banking and Finance has the
authority to examine such loans for compliance with sections 45-101.02 and
45-101.03. A licensee making a loan pursuant to this subdivision may obtain an
interest in any fixtures attached to such real property and any insurance
proceeds payable in connection with such real property or the loan;
(12) Loans secured by a reverse mortgage pursuant to section 45-702.01;
(13) Interest charges made on any goods or services sold under an
installment contract pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Sales Act. Subject to
section 45-338, it shall be lawful to contract for and receive any rate of
interest on such contract as the parties may expressly agree to in writing; or
(14) Fees which may be charged by a licensee for services pursuant to the
Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act.
Sec. 28. Section 45-190, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-190 For purposes of sections 45-189 to 45-191.11, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Advance fee means any fee, deposit, or consideration which is assessed
or collected, prior to the closing of a loan, by a loan broker and includes,
but is not limited to, any money assessed or collected for processing,
appraisals, credit checks, consultations, or expenses;
(2) Borrower means a person obtaining or desiring to obtain a loan of
money;
(3) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(4) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;
(5)(a) Loan broker means any person who:
(i) For or in expectation of consideration from a borrower, procures,
attempts to procure, arranges, or attempts to arrange a loan of money for a
borrower;
(ii) For or in expectation of consideration from a borrower, assists a
borrower in making an application to obtain a loan of money;
(iii) Is employed as an agent for the purpose of soliciting borrowers as
clients of the employer; or
(iv) Holds himself or herself out, through advertising, signs, or other
means, as a loan broker; and
(b) Loan broker does not include: (i) A bank, bank holding company, trust
company, savings and loan association, credit union, or subsidiary of a bank,
savings and loan association, building and loan association, or credit union
which is subject to regulation or supervision under the laws of the United
States or any state; (ii) a mortgage banker or an installment loan company
licensed or registered under the laws of the State of Nebraska; (iii) a credit
card company; (iv) an insurance company authorized to conduct business under
the laws of the State of Nebraska; or (v) a lender approved by the Federal
Housing Administration or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, if
the loan is secured or covered by guarantees, commitments, or agreements to
purchase or take over the same by the Federal Housing Administration or the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(6) Loan brokerage agreement means any agreement for services between a
loan broker and a borrower; and
-20-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
(7) Person means natural persons, corporations, trusts, unincorporated
associations, joint ventures, partnerships, and limited liability companies.
Sec. 29. Section 45-724, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-724 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an
applicant for a mortgage banker license or registration shall file with the
department a surety bond in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars,
furnished by a surety company authorized to do business in the State of
Nebraska. The surety bond also shall cover all mortgage loan originators who
are employees or independent agents of the applicant. The bond shall be for the
use of the State of Nebraska and any Nebraska resident who may have claims or
causes of action against the applicant or against an individual who is a
mortgage loan originator employed by, or in an independent agent relationship
with, the applicant. Submission of a rider to an existing bond indicating that
the required coverage is outstanding and evidencing the beneficiaries required
in this subsection shall satisfy the requirements of this section. The bond or
a substitute bond shall remain in effect during all periods of licensing or
registration.
(2) Upon filing of the mortgage report of condition required by section
45-726, a mortgage banker licensee or registrant shall maintain or increase its
surety bond to reflect the total dollar amount of the closed residential
mortgage loans originated or serviced in this state in the preceding calendar
year in accordance with the following table. A licensee or registrant may
decrease its surety bond in accordance with the following table if the surety
bond required is less than the amount of the surety bond on file with the
department.
Dollar Amount of Closed or Serviced
Residential Mortgage Loans Surety Bond Required
$0.00 to $5,000,000.00 $100,000.00
$5,000,000.01 to $10,000,000.00 $125,000.00
$10,000,000.01 to $25,000,000.00 $150,000.00
Over $25,000,000.00 $200,000.00
(3) Should the department determine that a mortgage banker licensee or
registrant does not maintain a surety bond in the amount required by subsection
(2) of this section, the department shall give written notification to the
mortgage banker licensee or registrant requiring him, her, or it to increase
the surety bond within thirty days to the amount required by subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) At any time the director may require the filing of a new or
supplemental bond in the form as provided in subsection (1) of this section if
he or she determines that the bond filed under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is exhausted or is inadequate for any reason, including the financial
condition of the licensee, the registrant, or the applicant for a license or
registration. The new or supplemental bond shall not exceed one million
dollars.
Sec. 30. Section 59-1715, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
59-1715 A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include a security as
defined by subdivision (14) (15) of section 8-1101.
Sec. 31. Section 59-1722, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
59-1722 (1) Any transaction involving the sale of a franchise as defined
in 16 C.F.R. 436.1(h), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025 2024,
shall be exempt from the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act, except that such
transactions shall be subject to subdivision (1)(d) of section 59-1757, those
provisions regulating or prescribing the use of the phrase buy-back or secured
investment or similar phrases as set forth in sections 59-1726 to 59-1728 and
59-1751, and all sections which provide for their enforcement. The exemption
shall only apply if:
(a) The franchise is offered and sold in compliance with the requirements
of 16 C.F.R. part 436, Disclosure Requirements and Prohibitions Concerning
Franchising, as such part existed on January 1, 2025 2024;
(b) Before placing any advertisement in a Nebraska-based publication,
offering for sale to any prospective purchaser in Nebraska, or making any
representations in connection with such offer or sale to any prospective
purchaser in Nebraska, the seller files a notice with the Department of Banking
and Finance which contains (i) the name, address, and telephone number of the
seller and the name under which the seller intends to do business and (ii) a
brief description of the plan offered by the seller; and
(c) The seller pays a filing fee of one hundred dollars.
(2) The department may request a copy of the disclosure document upon
receipt of a written complaint or inquiry regarding the seller or upon a
reasonable belief that a violation of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act
has occurred or may occur. The seller shall provide such copy within ten
business days of receipt of the request.
(3) All funds collected by the department under this section shall be
-21-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Securities Act Cash Fund.
(4) The Director of Banking and Finance may by order deny or revoke an
exemption specified in this section with respect to a particular offering of
one or more business opportunities if the director finds that such an order is
in the public interest or is necessary for the protection of purchasers. An
order shall not be entered without appropriate prior notice to all interested
parties, an opportunity for hearing, and written findings of fact and
conclusions of law. If the public interest or the protection of purchasers so
requires, the director may by order summarily deny or revoke an exemption
specified in this section pending final determination of any proceedings under
this section. An order under this section shall not operate retroactively.
Sec. 32. Section 69-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
69-2103 For purposes of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act:
(1) Advertisement means a commercial message in any medium that aids,
promotes, or assists directly or indirectly a consumer rental purchase
agreement but does not include in-store merchandising aids such as window signs
and ceiling banners;
(2) Cash price means the price at which the lessor would have sold the
property to the consumer for cash on the date of the consumer rental purchase
agreement for the property;
(3) Consumer means a natural person who rents property under a consumer
rental purchase agreement;
(4) Consumer rental purchase agreement means an agreement which is for the
use of property by a consumer primarily for personal, family, or household
purposes, which is for an initial period of four months or less, whether or not
there is any obligation beyond the initial period, which is automatically
renewable with each payment, and which permits the consumer to become the owner
of the property. A consumer rental purchase agreement in compliance with the
act shall not be construed to be a lease or agreement which constitutes a
credit sale as defined in 12 C.F.R. 1026.2(a)(16), as such regulation existed
on January 1, 2025 2024, and 15 U.S.C. 1602(h), as such section existed on
January 1, 2025 2024, or a lease which constitutes a consumer lease as defined
in 12 C.F.R. 1013.2, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025 2024.
Consumer rental purchase agreement does not include:
(a) Any lease for agricultural, business, or commercial purposes;
(b) Any lease made to an organization;
(c) A lease or agreement which constitutes an installment sale or
installment contract as defined in section 45-335;
(d) A security interest as defined in subdivision (35) of section 1-201,
Uniform Commercial Code; and
(e) A home solicitation sale as defined in section 69-1601;
(5) Consummation means the occurrence of an event which causes a consumer
to become contractually obligated on a consumer rental purchase agreement;
(6) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(7) Lease payment means a payment to be made by the consumer for the right
of possession and use of the property for a specific lease period but does not
include taxes imposed on such payment;
(8) Lease period means a week, month, or other specific period of time,
during which the consumer has the right to possess and use the property after
paying the lease payment and applicable taxes for such period;
(9) Lessor means a person who in the ordinary course of business operates
a commercial outlet which regularly leases, offers to lease, or arranges for
the leasing of property under a consumer rental purchase agreement;
(10) Property means any property that is not real property under the laws
of this state when made available for a consumer rental purchase agreement; and
(11) Total of payments to acquire ownership means the total of all charges
imposed by the lessor and payable by the consumer as a condition of acquiring
ownership of the property. Total of payments to acquire ownership includes
lease payments and any initial nonrefundable administrative fee or required
delivery charge but does not include taxes, late charges, reinstatement fees,
or charges for optional products or services.
Sec. 33. Section 69-2104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
69-2104 (1) Before entering into any consumer rental purchase agreement,
the lessor shall disclose to the consumer the following items as applicable:
(a) A brief description of the leased property sufficient to identify the
property to the consumer and lessor;
(b) The number, amount, and timing of all payments included in the total
of payments to acquire ownership;
(c) The total of payments to acquire ownership;
(d) A statement that the consumer will not own the property until the
consumer has paid the total of payments to acquire ownership plus applicable
taxes;
(e) A statement that the total of payments to acquire ownership does not
include other charges such as taxes, late charges, reinstatement fees, or
charges for optional products or services the consumer may have elected to
purchase and that the consumer should see the rental purchase agreement for an
explanation of these charges;
(f) A statement that the consumer is responsible for the fair market
value, remaining rent, early purchase option amount, or cost of repair of the
property, whichever is less, if it is lost, stolen, damaged, or destroyed;
(g) A statement indicating whether the property is new or used. A
-22-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
statement that indicates that new property is used shall not be a violation of
the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act;
(h) A statement of the cash price of the property. When the agreement
involves a lease for two or more items, a statement of the aggregate cash price
of all items shall satisfy the requirement of this subdivision;
(i) The total amount of the initial payments required to be paid before
consummation of the agreement or delivery of the property, whichever occurs
later, and an itemization of the components of the initial payment, including
any initial nonrefundable administrative fee or delivery charge, lease payment,
taxes, or fee or charge for optional products or services;
(j) A statement clearly summarizing the terms of the consumer's options to
purchase, including a statement that at any time after the first periodic
payment is made the consumer may acquire ownership of the property by tendering
an amount which may not exceed fifty-five percent of the difference between the
total of payments to acquire ownership and the total of lease payments the
consumer has paid on the property at that time;
(k) A statement identifying the party responsible for maintaining or
servicing the property while it is being leased, together with a description of
that responsibility and a statement that if any part of a manufacturer's
warranty covers the leased property at the time the consumer acquires ownership
of the property, such warranty shall be transferred to the consumer if allowed
by the terms of the warranty; and
(l) The date of the transaction and the names of the lessor and the
consumer.
(2) With respect to matters specifically governed by the federal Consumer
Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., as such act existed on January
1, 2025 2024, compliance with such act shall satisfy the requirements of this
section.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a lessor who
complies with the disclosure requirements of the federal Consumer Credit
Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. 1667a, as such section existed on January 1, 2025
2024, with respect to a consumer rental purchase agreement entered into with a
consumer.
Sec. 34. Section 69-2112, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
69-2112 (1) Any advertisement for a consumer rental purchase agreement
which refers to or states the amount of any payment or the right to acquire
ownership for any specific item shall also state clearly and conspicuously the
following if applicable:
(a) That the transaction advertised is a consumer rental purchase
agreement;
(b) The total of payments to acquire ownership; and
(c) That the consumer acquires no ownership rights until the total of
payments to acquire ownership is paid.
(2) Any owner or employee of any medium in which an advertisement appears
or through which it is disseminated shall not be liable under this section.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to an advertisement
which does not refer to a specific item of property, which does not refer to or
state the amount of any payment, or which is published in the yellow pages of a
telephone directory or any similar directory of business.
(4) With respect to matters specifically governed by the federal Consumer
Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., as such act existed on January
1, 2025 2024, compliance with such act shall satisfy the requirements of this
section.
Sec. 35. Section 76-710.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-710.02 Whenever lands situated in an irrigation district are acquired
by any condemner through eminent domain, and such lands at the time of their
acquisition by any condemner, are irrigable and are being served or are capable
of being served by facilities of the district to the same extent and in the
same manner as lands of like character held under private ownership were
served, the condemner, as part of the compensable damages of the acquisition
and at the time of such acquisition, shall make a lump-sum payment to the
irrigation district in an amount sufficient to:
(1) Pay the pro rata share of the district's bonded indebtedness, if any,
and the pro rata share of the district's contract indebtedness to the United
States or to the State of Nebraska, if any, allocable to such lands, plus
interest on such pro rata share in the event such indebtedness is not callable
in advance of maturity;
(2) Pay any deferred installments of local improvement district
assessments against such lands, if any; and
(3) Produce, if invested at an annual rate of interest equivalent to the
rate of interest established in section 45-103 that set forth in current tables
issued by the Director of Banking and Finance of the State of Nebraska, a sum
of money equal to the annual increase in operation and maintenance costs
against remaining lands in the district resulting from the severance from the
district of the lands thus acquired by the condemner. For the purposes of
determining the amount of such lump-sum payment, the annual maintenance and
operation assessment of the district shall be considered to be the average for
the ten years, or so many years as the district has assessment experience, if
less than ten years, preceding the date of acquisition.
Sec. 36. Section 4A-108, Uniform Commercial Code, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
-23-

LB251 LB251
2025 2025
4A-108 Relationship to federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this article does not apply to a
funds transfer any part of which is governed by the federal Electronic Fund
Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025
2024.
(b) This article applies to a funds transfer that is a remittance transfer
as defined in the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693o-1, as
such section existed on January 1, 2025 2024, unless the remittance transfer is
an electronic fund transfer as defined in the federal Electronic Fund Transfer
Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693a, as such section existed on January 1, 2025 2024.
(c) In a funds transfer to which this article applies, in the event of an
inconsistency between an applicable provision of this article and an applicable
provision of the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act, the provision of the
federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act governs to the extent of the
inconsistency.
Sec. 37. Original sections 8-113, 8-157, 8-226, 8-305, 8-1506,
21-1725.01, 21-1728, 44-708, 45-101.04, 45-190, 45-724, 59-1715, and 76-710.02,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 8-135, 8-141, 8-143.01,
8-157.01, 8-183.04, 8-1,140, 8-318, 8-355, 8-1101, 8-1101.01, 8-1704, 8-1707,
8-2724, 8-2903, 8-3005, 8-3007, 21-17,102, 21-17,115, 59-1722, 69-2103,
69-2104, and 69-2112, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section
4A-108, Uniform Commercial Code, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
are repealed.
Sec. 38. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-24-